src/adjectives.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +Mas +Fem +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
Adjectives;

LEXICON Adjectives

baix	Adjective;
sec		Adjective;
petit	Adjective;
vell	Adjective;
verd	Adjective;
trist	Adjective;


!!!next adjectives are special cases!!!

europeu:europeu+Adj+Mas+Sg		#;
europea:europea+Adj+Fem+Sg		#;
jueu:jueu+Adj+Mas+Sg			#;
jueva:jueva+Adj+Fem+Sg			#;


LEXICON Adjective
+Adj+Mas+Sg:0	#;
+Adj+Fem+Sg:a 	#;
+Adj+Mas+Pl:s 	#;
+Adj+Fem+Pl:es	#;
